South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5398.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The imposition of the user fee on gasoline and diesel fuel pursuant to Section 12-28-310(D), and the corresponding amount on the imposition of the road tax pursuant to Section 56-11-410 are suspended for sixty days from the effective date of this joint resolution. Upon the conclusion of sixty days, the impositions are reinstated at the rates set by law. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect fifteen days after approval by the Governor. ----XX----